Oklahoma, session 2026, SB9.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-305.13 of Title 47, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, any
person receiving benefits from the Oklahoma Law Enforcement
Retirement System as of June 30, 2025, and who continues to receive
benefits on or after the effective date of this act shall receive a
two percent (2%) increase in benefits.
B. Any increase in benefits a person is eligible to receive
pursuant to subsection B, C, or D of Section 2-305 of Title 47 of
Req. No. 1726 Page 1

RBS No. 1726
the Oklahoma Statutes after the effective date of this act shall be
offset by the increase in benefits provided by this section.

60-1-1726 RD 2/27/2025 9:31:48 AM




















Req. No. 1726 Page 2